Washington statutes.
RCW 36.21.100

Annual report to department of revenue on property tax levies and related matters.

Every county assessor shall report to the department of revenue on the property tax levies and related matters within the county annually at a date and in a form prescribed by the department of revenue. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the results of sales-assessment ratio studies performed by the assessor. The ratio studies shall be based on use classes of real property and shall be performed under a plan approved by the department of revenue.

[ 1991 c 218 s 4; 1987 c 138 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 218: See note following RCW 36.21.015.